Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 459	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 459	ar	e/453	.		#present
SFX 459	ar	es/453	.		#present
SFX 459	ar	a/453	.		#present
SFX 459	ar	em/453	.		#present
SFX 459	ar	eu/453	.		#present
SFX 459	ar	en/453	.		#present

SFX 460	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 460	ar	e/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 460	ar	es/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 460	ar	em/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 460	ar	eu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 460	ar	en/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 461	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 461	ar	ar/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 461	ar	a/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 461	ar	e/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 461	ar	em/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 461	ar	eu/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 461	ar	en/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 462	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 462	ar	í	.		#perfecte
SFX 462	ar	ares	.		#perfecte
SFX 462	ar	à	.		#perfecte
SFX 462	ar	àrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 462	ar	àreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 462	ar	aren	.		#perfecte

SFX 463	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 463	jar	jar/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 463	jar	ja/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 463	jar	ge/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 463	jar	gem/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 463	jar	geu/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 463	jar	gen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 464	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 464	jar	gí	.		#perfecte
SFX 464	jar	jares	.		#perfecte
SFX 464	jar	jà	.		#perfecte
SFX 464	jar	jàrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 464	jar	jàreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 464	jar	jaren	.		#perfecte

SFX 465	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 465	jar	ge/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 465	jar	ges/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 465	jar	gem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 465	jar	geu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 465	jar	gen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 466	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 466	jar	ge/453	.		#present
SFX 466	jar	ges/453	.		#present
SFX 466	jar	ja/453	.		#present
SFX 466	jar	gem/453	.		#present
SFX 466	jar	geu/453	.		#present
SFX 466	jar	gen/453	.		#present

SFX 467	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 467	ir	ia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 467	ir	ies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 467	ir	íem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 467	ir	íeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 467	ir	ien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 468	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 468	ir	í	.		#perfecte
SFX 468	ir	ires	.		#perfecte
SFX 468	ir	írem	.		#perfecte
SFX 468	ir	íreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 468	ir	iren	.		#perfecte

SFX 469	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 469	ir	ira	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 469	ir	ires	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 469	ir	írem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 469	ir	íreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 469	ir	iren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 470	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 470	r	xc/453	.		#present
SFX 470	r	xes/453	.		#present
SFX 470	r	x/453	.		#present
SFX 470	r	m/453	.		#present
SFX 470	r	u/453	.		#present
SFX 470	r	xen/453	.		#present

SFX 471	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 471	r	xca/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 471	r	xques/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 471	r	m/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 471	r	u/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 471	r	xquen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 472	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 472	r	r/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 472	r	x/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 472	r	xca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 472	r	m/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 472	r	u/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 472	r	xquen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 473	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 473	car	que/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 473	car	ques/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 473	car	quem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 473	car	queu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 473	car	quen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 474	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 474	car	que/453	.		#present
SFX 474	car	ques/453	.		#present
SFX 474	car	ca/453	.		#present
SFX 474	car	quem/453	.		#present
SFX 474	car	queu/453	.		#present
SFX 474	car	quen/453	.		#present

SFX 475	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 475	car	car/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 475	car	ca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 475	car	que/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 475	car	quem/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 475	car	queu/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 475	car	quen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 476	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 476	car	quí	.		#perfecte
SFX 476	car	cares	.		#perfecte
SFX 476	car	cà	.		#perfecte
SFX 476	car	càrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 476	car	càreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 476	car	caren	.		#perfecte

SFX 477	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 477	ar	uí	.		#perfecte
SFX 477	ar	ares	.		#perfecte
SFX 477	ar	à	.		#perfecte
SFX 477	ar	àrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 477	ar	àreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 477	ar	aren	.		#perfecte

SFX 478	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 478	ar	ue/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 478	ar	ues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 478	ar	uem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 478	ar	ueu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 478	ar	uen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 479	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 479	ar	ue/453	.		#present
SFX 479	ar	ues/453	.		#present
SFX 479	ar	a/453	.		#present
SFX 479	ar	uem/453	.		#present
SFX 479	ar	ueu/453	.		#present
SFX 479	ar	uen/453	.		#present

SFX 480	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 480	ar	ar/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 480	ar	a/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 480	ar	ue/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 480	ar	uem/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 480	ar	ueu/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 480	ar	uen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 481	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 481	e	ia	.		#hipotetic
SFX 481	e	ies	.		#hipotetic
SFX 481	e	íem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 481	e	íeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 481	e	ien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 482	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 482	e	é	.		#futur
SFX 482	e	às	.		#futur
SFX 482	e	à	.		#futur
SFX 482	e	em	.		#futur
SFX 482	e	eu	.		#futur
SFX 482	e	an	.		#futur

SFX 483	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 483	dre	guí	.		#perfecte
SFX 483	dre	gueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 483	dre	gué	.		#perfecte
SFX 483	dre	guérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 483	dre	guéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 483	dre	gueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 484	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 484	dre	guera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 484	dre	gueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 484	dre	guérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 484	dre	guéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 484	dre	gueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 485	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 485	dre	ga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 485	dre	gues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 485	dre	gam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 485	dre	gau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 485	dre	guen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 486	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 486	çar	ce/453	.		#present
SFX 486	çar	ces/453	.		#present
SFX 486	çar	ça/453	.		#present
SFX 486	çar	cem/453	.		#present
SFX 486	çar	ceu/453	.		#present
SFX 486	çar	cen/453	.		#present

SFX 487	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 487	çar	çar/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 487	çar	ça/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 487	çar	ce/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 487	çar	cem/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 487	çar	ceu/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 487	çar	cen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 488	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 488	çar	cí	.		#perfecte
SFX 488	çar	çares	.		#perfecte
SFX 488	çar	çà	.		#perfecte
SFX 488	çar	çàrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 488	çar	çàreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 488	çar	çaren	.		#perfecte

SFX 489	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 489	çar	ce/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 489	çar	ces/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 489	çar	cem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 489	çar	ceu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 489	çar	cen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
