Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
arrebaçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
aspirar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
assagetar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
assossegar/451,455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
bavejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
cedir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
centellejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
clarificar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
codirigir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
comprendre/481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
comprometre/481,482,503,504,505,506,510,511,1062
confondre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1070
contendre/481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
cultivar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
culturisar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desapegar/455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
descompondre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1059
descomprimir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
desconvindre/481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,1056
desembotir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
desentendre/481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1089
desenverniçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
desfavorir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
desqualificar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
dessecar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
dialogar/455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
encendre/451,481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
encrispolar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
encristalar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
encuiraçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
encuirar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
enfervorir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
ensogar/451,455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
entendre/451,481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
entreobrir/451,455,456,467,468,469,620,621,622,828,1067
entroncar/451,455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
envanir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
envermellir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
envoldre/451,481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1072
equivaldre/451,481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1056
erradicar/451,455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
esforçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
esguaçar/451,455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
estremir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
forquejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
justificar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
lascar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
malprendre/481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
malvendre/481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
marbrar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
marchar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
marrar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
obvindre/451,481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,566,567,568,569,570,571,572,573,1056
ofendre/451,481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
omplir/451,455,456,467,468,469,776,777,778,828,1054
partejar/451,455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
patir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
pegar/451,455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
perseguir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
reexpedir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
referir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
repondre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1059
reprendre/481,482,483,484,485,490,507,508,1058
reviure/481,482,512,600,601,602,603,604,1073
revoldre/481,482,483,484,490,769,770,771,772,773,774,775,1056
secar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
significar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
sortir/455,456,467,468,469,828,978,979,980,1012,1013,1014,1015,1016,1017,1018,1019,1054
sugerir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
suprimir/455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
tartamudejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
tenallar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
tensar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
terciar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
traçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
tropeçar/455,456,457,458,486,487,488,489,828,846,1054
